District of Columbia statutes.
29-604.02

Becoming partner.

(a)

Upon formation of a partnership under § 29-602.02(a), a person becomes a partner.

(b)

After formation of a partnership, a person becomes a partner:

(1)

As provided in the partnership agreement;

(2)

As a result of a transaction effective under Subchapter [subchapter] IX of this chapter or Chapter 2 of this title; or

(3)

With the consent of all the partners.

(c)

A person may become a partner without:

(1)

Acquiring a transferable interest; or

(2)

Making or being obligated to make a contribution to the partnership.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(4)(B), (D), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-601.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-154.2.
2001 Ed., § 33-104.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section, which formerly read: “Distributions in kind. A partner shall have no right to receive, and shall not be required to accept, a distribution in kind.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 402 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act). See Vol. 6, Part I , Uniform Laws Annotated, Master Edition.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.